Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201113-319
County; sales
and use tax authorized; limitation; election.

Any
county by resolution of the governing body may impose a sales and use tax
of one-half percent, one percent, or one and one-half percent upon the same
transactions sourced as provided in sections 77-2703.01 to 77-2703.04 within
the county, but outside any incorporated municipality which has adopted a
local sales tax pursuant to section 77-27,142, on which the state is authorized
to impose a tax pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, as amended from
time to time. Any sales and use tax imposed pursuant to this section must
be used (1) to
finance public safety services
provided by a public safety commission,
(2) to
provide the county share of funds required under any other agreement executed
under the Interlocal Cooperation Act or Joint Public Agency Act, or (3) to finance public safety services
provided by the county. A sales and use tax shall not be imposed
pursuant to this section until an election has been held and a majority of
the qualified electors have approved the tax pursuant to sections 13-322 and
13-323.

Laws 1996, LB 1177, § 6;

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 53;

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB106, § 2.
August 27, 2011
Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.